Utah statutes.
78B-6-130.   Preplacement and postplacement adoptive studies -- Review by
court.
(1)  If the person or agency conducting the evaluation disapproves the
adoptive placement, either in the preplacement or postplacement adoptive
evaluation, the court may dismiss the petition.  However, upon request of a
prospective adoptive parent, the court shall order that an additional
preplacement or postplacement adoptive evaluation be conducted, and hold a
hearing on the suitability of the adoption, including testimony of interested
parties.
(2)  Prior to finalization of a petition for adoption the court shall review
and consider the information and recommendations contained in the preplacement
and postplacement adoptive studies required by Sections 78B-6-128 and
78B-6-129.
